District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.191

Streetscape Loan Relief Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Streetscape Loan Relief Fund (“Fund”), which shall be used solely to make loans in accordance with subsection (c) of this section. The Fund shall be funded by annual appropriations; provided, that for fiscal year 2011, the amount deposited in the Fund shall be $723,000. All funds received from repayments of loans shall be deposited into the Fund.

(b)

All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (c) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

(c)

If the District undertakes a streetscape construction or rehabilitation project, the Mayor, in his or her sole discretion, may make interest-free loans from the Fund to any individual or entity that operates a retail business inside or adjoining the streetscape construction or rehabilitation project. To obtain a loan, a retail business shall submit a loan application in the form and with the information that the Mayor shall require. The Mayor shall determine the terms and conditions of each loan based upon the loan application submitted by the retail business; provided, that the term of a loan pursuant to this section shall not exceed 5 years after the termination of the streetscape construction or rehabilitation project.

(d)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this section.

Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-370, § 603, 58 DCR 1008
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-121 added a section to read as follows:
“Sec. 2. Authority to reconstruct building projections upon completion of 18th Street streetscape project.
“(a) Upon completion of the 18th Street streetscape project (capital project number SR036A), a building owner or any tenant of the building owner shall be permitted to reconstruct any building projection that existed before the commencement of the streetscape project and that was altered because of the streetscape project; provided, that the building projection is identical to the building projection that existed at the commencement of the streetscape project and the building owner, or the tenants of the building owner, obtains the building and construction permits required by law and pays the associated building and construction permit fees; provided further, that reconstruction of any building projections for which no public space permit has been issued must be reconstructed as a temporary structure.
“(b) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) ‘Building projection’ means a bay window, staircase, patio, sidewalk café, or other fixture attached to a building and located on public space.
“(2) ‘Streetscape project’ means a roadway reconstruction on a commercial main street.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-121 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-246 added provisions concerning authority to reconstruct building projections upon completion of 18th Street streetscape project, to read as follows:
“(a) Upon completion of the 18th Street streetscape project (capital project number SR036A), a building owner or any tenant of the building owner shall be permitted to reconstruct any building projection that existed before the commencement of the streetscape project and that was altered because of the streetscape project; provided, that the building projection is identical to the building projection that existed at the commencement of the streetscape project and the building owner, or the tenants of the building owner, obtains the building and construction permits required by law and pays the associated building and construction permit fees; provided further, that reconstruction of any building projections for which no public space permit has been issued must be reconstructed as a temporary structure.
“(b) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) ‘Building projection’ means a bay window, staircase, patio, sidewalk café, or other fixture attached to a building and located on public space.
“(2) ‘Streetscape project’ means a roadway reconstruction on a commercial main street.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-246 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1032 of Fiscal Year 2012 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-93, June 29, 2011, 58 DCR 5599).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Streetscape Reconstruction Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-268, January 12, 2012, 59 DCR 211).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 2 of Streetscape Reconstruction Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-340, April 8, 2012, 59 DCR 2786).
For temporary (90 days) streetscape reconstruction, see § 2 of the Streetscape Reconstruction Congressional Review Emergency of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-23, March 7, 2013, 60 DCR 3982, 20 DCSTAT 481).
Short title: Section 601 of D.C. Law 18-370 provided that subtitle A of title VI of the act may be cited as “Streetscape Fund Amendment Act of 2010”.
Delegation of Authority pursuant to the Streetscape Fund Amendment Act of 2010, see Mayor’s Order 2011-128, July 29, 2011 ( 58 DCR 6692).